Wyoming statutes. Title 17 Corporations, Partnerships and Associations
Article 5. Office and Agent

§ 17-19-501.
Registered office and registered agent.

Each corporation shall continuously maintain in this state:

A registered office as provided in W.S.

17-28-101

through

17-28-111

; and

A registered agent as provided in W.S.

17-28-101

through

17-28-111

.

through (C) Repealed by Laws 2008, ch. 90, § 3.

The provisions of W.S.

17-28-101

through

17-28-111

shall apply to all nonprofit corporations.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 1; 2008, ch. 90, §§ 2, 3.

The 2008 amendment,

effective January 1, 2009, rewrote (a)(i) and (a)(ii), in part by repealing (a)(ii)(A) through (C), relating to registered agents; and inserted (b).

§ 17-19-502.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2008, ch. 90, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 1, related to changes of registered office or registered agent.

§ 17-19-503.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2008, ch. 90, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 1, related to resignation of registered agents.

§ 17-19-504.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2008, ch. 90, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 1, related to service on corporations.